Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Health Care Insurance Provisions, Requirements, and Restrictions.

Sec. 21.54.100.
Unfair discrimination.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in the group market may not establish rules for eligibility, including continued eligibility and waiting periods under the plan, for an individual or dependent of an individual based on

health status;

medical condition, including physical and mental illnesses;

claims experience;

receipt of health care;

medical history;

genetic information;

evidence of insurability, including conditions arising from acts of domestic violence; or

disability.

A health care insurer may not require an individual, as a condition of enrollment or continued enrollment under a health care insurance plan offered in the group market, to pay a premium, contribution, or policy fee greater than a premium, contribution, or policy fee for a similarly situated individual already enrolled in the plan on the basis of a health status factor for the individual or a dependent of the individual.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.54.105.
Special enrollment requirements related to Medicaid and state child health plan coverage.

A health care insurer that offers, issues, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in the group market shall allow an eligible employee or dependent of an employee to enroll for coverage under the terms of the plan if the employee or dependent

is covered by Medicaid under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396u (Title XIX of the Social Security Act) or under a state child health plan under 42 U.S.C. 1397aa — 1397mm (Title XXI of the Social Security Act), coverage is terminated because of loss of eligibility, and the employee requests coverage under the health care insurance plan not later than 60 days after the date of termination; or

becomes eligible for assistance under Medicaid under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396u (Title XIX of the Social Security Act) or under a state child health plan under 42 U.S.C. 1397aa — 1397mm (Title XXI of the Social Security Act), with respect to coverage under a health care insurance plan, including under any waiver or demonstration project conducted under or in relation to the Medicaid or state child health plan, and the employee requests coverage under the health care insurance plan not later than 60 days after the date the employee or dependent is determined to be eligible for assistance.

History.

(§ 5 ch 55 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.54.110.
Preexisting condition exclusion.

A health care insurance plan offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed in the group market may not contain a preexisting condition exclusion that

relates to a condition, regardless of cause, for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received more than six months before the enrollment date;

considers genetic information as a condition for which a preexisting condition exclusion may be imposed in absence of a diagnosis of the condition related to the information;

extends for more than 12 months after the enrollment date of a covered individual; or

excludes a condition relating to pregnancy.

A period of a preexisting condition exclusion permissible under (a) of this section must be reduced by the aggregate of periods of creditable coverage, if any, as determined in AS

21.54.120

, applicable to the participant or beneficiary as of the enrollment date. The aggregate of periods of creditable coverage is determined by adding together all periods of creditable coverage before the enrollment date, excluding periods of creditable coverage before a continuous break in coverage of more than 90 days. A waiting period or affiliation period may not be considered in determining the 90-day period. This subsection does not apply if an individual’s most recent period of creditable coverage ended on a date more than 90 days before the enrollment date. This subsection does not preclude application of a waiting period to all new enrollees under a health care insurance plan.

A health care insurance plan offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed in this state in the group market may not apply a preexisting condition exclusion to an individual who is (1) a newborn covered under creditable coverage as of the last day of the 30-day period beginning with the date of birth; or (2) adopted or placed for adoption before attaining 18 years of age and who is covered under creditable coverage as of the last day of the 30-day period beginning with the date of adoption or placement for adoption. This subsection does not apply to an individual after the end of the first continuous 90-day period during all of which the individual was not covered under creditable coverage.

A health care insurance plan offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed in this state in the group market may exclude coverage for late enrollees for the greater of 18 months or an 18-month preexisting condition exclusion. If both a waiting period and a preexisting condition exclusion under (a) of this section are applicable to a late enrollee, the combined period may not exceed 18 months from the date the individual enrolls for coverage under a health care insurance plan.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.54.120.
Creditable coverage.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan in the group market shall count a period of creditable coverage based on

the standard method authorized by 42 U.S.C. 300gg (Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996) for determining creditable coverage without regard to the specific benefits covered during the period; or

an alternative method based on coverage of benefits within each of several classes or categories of benefits specified in federal regulation if

made on a uniform basis for all participants and beneficiaries; and

the insurer counts a period of creditable coverage with respect to any class or category of benefits if any level of benefits is covered within the class or category.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan in the group market shall provide a certification of coverage

at the time an individual ceases to be covered under a health care insurance plan or becomes covered under a federal continuation provision;

at the time an individual ceases to be covered under a federal continuation provision; and

upon request by an individual or on behalf of an individual within 24 months after the date coverage under the health care insurance plan or a federal continuation provision ceases.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan in the group market shall establish periods of creditable coverage with respect to an individual through certification under (b) of this section or as specified in federal regulation.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan in the group market shall prominently state and describe the effect of the health care insurer’s election to count a period of creditable coverage using a permissible alternative method

in any disclosure statement concerning the health care insurance plan or coverage;

to each enrollee at the time of enrollment; and

to each employer at the time of offer or sale of coverage.

A health care insurer issuing a certification under (b) of this section shall disclose information regarding coverage of classes and categories of health benefits available under the health care insurer’s plan at the request of an entity that

enrolls an individual who has provided the certification of coverage;

elects to count a period of creditable coverage according to a permissible alternative method under (a)(2) of this section; and

pays the health care insurer for the reasonable cost, if any, of disclosing the information described in this subsection.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 27 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.54.130.
Renewability, termination, and modification of coverage.

Except for a multiple employer welfare arrangement, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan in the group market shall renew or continue in force the coverage under the plan at the option of the plan sponsor unless

the plan sponsor has failed to pay premiums or contributions in accordance with the terms of the health care insurance plan or the health care insurer has not received timely premium payments;

the plan sponsor has performed an act or practice that constitutes fraud or made an intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the terms of the coverage;

the plan sponsor has failed to comply with a material plan provision relating to minimum participation or employer contribution requirements;

the health care insurer ceases to offer coverage in accordance with (b) and (c) of this section;

the health care insurer offers the plan only through a network plan and there is no longer an enrollee in connection with the plan who lives, resides, or works in the service area of the insurer or in the area for which the insurer is authorized to transact business; or

in the case of a plan that is made available only through a bona fide association, the employer’s membership in the association ceases and coverage is terminated uniformly without regard to a health status factor of a covered individual.

A health care insurer may discontinue offering a particular type of health care insurance plan in the group market as permitted by this title if the insurer

provides written notice of the decision to discontinue coverage to all affected plan sponsors, participants, and beneficiaries and to the insurance regulatory official in each state in which an affected covered employee or dependent is known to reside; notice required under this paragraph must be given at least 180 days before the insurer fails to renew the health care insurance plan;

provides written notice of the decision to discontinue coverage to the director and to the insurance regulatory official in each state in which the insurer is licensed at least 30 days before notice is given to the affected plan sponsors, participants, and beneficiaries as described under (1) of this subsection;

offers to each plan sponsor who is provided the particular type of health care insurance plan the option to purchase another health care insurance plan currently being offered by the insurer to plan sponsors in the same market in the state; and

acts uniformly without regard to the claims experience of those plan sponsors or to any health status factor of a covered participant or beneficiary or a new participant or beneficiary who may become eligible for coverage.

A health care insurer may discontinue offering and renewing all health care insurance plans in the small group market, large group market, or both, as permitted by this title if the insurer

provides written notice of the decision to discontinue coverage to all affected plan sponsors, participants, and beneficiaries and to the insurance regulatory official in each state in which an affected covered employee or dependent is known to reside; notice required under this paragraph must be given at least 180 days before discontinuation of the plans;

provides written notice of the decision to discontinue coverage to the director and to the insurance regulatory official in each state in which the insurer is licensed at least 30 days before the notice is given to the affected plan sponsors, participants, and beneficiaries as described under (1) of this subsection; and

does not issue a health care insurance plan in the group market in this state for five years from the date the last group health care insurance plan was discontinued.

A health care insurer may modify a large employer’s health care insurance plan at the time of plan renewal.

Except for coverage available only through a bona fide association, a health care insurer may modify a small employer’s health care insurance plan consistent with this title at the time of plan renewal only if the modification is uniform for all small employers with the same health care insurance plan.

If a covered employee or dependent has committed a fraudulent act or made an intentional misrepresentation of a material fact in regard to a health care insurance plan, a health care insurer may terminate the coverage of the employee or the dependent under the plan.

For purposes of this section, a plan sponsor includes an employer member of a bona fide association for a health care insurance plan made available by the health care insurer only through a bona fide association.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 44 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.54.140.
Renewability of coverage for a multiple employer welfare arrangement.

A health benefit plan that is a multiple employer welfare arrangement subject to this title may not deny an employer whose employees are covered under the plan continued access to the same or a different plan according to the terms of the plan, except

for nonpayment of contributions;

for fraud or other intentional misrepresentation of material fact by the employer;

for noncompliance with material plan provisions;

where the plan is ceasing to offer any coverage in a geographic area;

for a health benefit plan that offers benefits through a network plan if

there is no longer an individual enrolled through the employer who lives, resides, or works in the service area of the network plan; and

the multiple employer welfare arrangement applies this paragraph without regard to the claims experience of the employer or a health status factor in relation to an individual or an individual’s dependent; and

for failure to meet the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement to renew a collective bargaining or other agreement requiring or authorizing contributions to the plan or to employ employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.54.150.
Mental health benefits. [Repealed, § 116 ch 81 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.54.151.
Mental health or substance use disorder benefits.

A health care insurer that offers a health care insurance plan in the group market shall comply with the mental health or substance use disorder benefit requirements established under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-26.

History.

(§ 39 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 6 ch 55 SLA 2009; am § 11 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For group health insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, substituted “under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-26” for “under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-5” at the end.

Sec. 21.54.160.
“Excepted benefits” defined.

“Excepted benefits” means benefits under one or more or any combination of the following:

benefits under

coverage only for accident, disability income insurance, or both;

coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;

liability insurance, including general liability insurance and automobile liability insurance;

workers’ compensation or substantially similar insurance;

automobile medical payment insurance;

credit-only insurance;

coverage for on-site medical clinics; or

other similar insurance coverage, as specified in federal law, under which benefits for medical care are secondary or incidental to other insurance benefits;

if offered as a separate insurance policy and otherwise not an integral part of a health care insurance plan, benefits under

limited scope dental or vision coverage;

coverage for long-term care, nursing home care, home health care, community-based care, or any combination; or

other similar limited benefits as specified in federal law;

if offered as independent noncoordinated benefits, benefits under coverage only for a specified disease or illness, or hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance; as used in this paragraph, “independent, noncoordinated benefits” means benefits that are provided under a separate policy if

there is no coordination between the provision of the benefits and an exclusion of benefits under a health care insurance plan maintained by the same plan sponsor; and

the benefits are paid with respect to an event without regard to whether benefits are provided for the event under a health care insurance plan maintained by the same plan sponsor;

if offered as a separate insurance policy, benefits under

Medicare supplemental policy as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395ss(g)(1) (Social Security Act);

coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under 10 U.S.C. 1071 — 1090; or

similar supplemental coverage provided to coverage under a health benefit plan.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Sec. 21.54.170.
Determination of size of employer.

The determination of whether an employer is a large or small employer is subject to the following:

the size of an employer that was not in existence throughout the preceding calendar year must be based on the average number of employees that the employer is reasonably expected to employ on the business days in the current calendar year;

all persons treated as a single employer under 26 U.S.C. 414(b), (c), (m), or (o) must be treated as one employer; and

a reference to a large or small employer includes by reference any predecessor of that employer.

History.

(§ 59 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.54.180.
Individual health care insurance policies offered in the group market. [Repealed, § 94(b) ch 23 SLA 2011.]